District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0493.
BE IT ENACTED by the Council of the District of Columbia, That this act may be cited
37 as the “Strengthening Tenant Receivership and Oversight for Neighborhood Growth (STRONG)
38 Homes Amendment Act of 2025”.

39 Sec. 2. The Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Properties Omnibus Amendment
40 Act of 2000, effective April 27, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-281; D.C. Official Code § 42-3171.01 et
41 seq.), is amended as follows:
42 (a) Section 502 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3651.02) is amended as follows:
43 (1)Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
44 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Title 12 of the
45 District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, or its equivalent,” and inserting the phrase “Title 12
46 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, the Air Quality Amendment Act of 2013,
47 effective September 9, 2014 (D.C. Law 20-135; D.C. Official Code § 8-241.01 et seq.), and its
48 implementing regulations, or any equivalent District or federal law or regulation,” in its place.
49 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
50 (i) Sub-paragraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
51 inserting a semicolon in its place.
52 (ii) Sub-paragraph (D) is amended by striking the period and
53 inserting the phrase “; or” in its place.
54 (iii) A new sub-paragraph (E) is added to read as follows:
55 “(E) By email service on the property owner, lessor, or manager, or the
56 agent thereof, using any email address identified by the tax records, business license records, or
57 business entity registration records, or otherwise provided or confirmed by the property owner,
58 lessor, or manager, or the agent thereof, to the Department of Buildings, the Department of
59 Licensing and Consumer Protection, or any other agency or instrumentality of the District.”
60 (2) Subsection (c)(2) is amended as follows:

61 (A) Sub-paragraph (E) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
62 inserting a semicolon in its place.
63 (B) New Sub-paragraphs (E-i), (E-ii), (E-iii), (E-iv), and (E-v) are added
64 to read as follows:
65 “(E1) Indoor mold contamination;
66 “(E-2) Inoperable cooking appliances or refrigerator;
67 “(E-3) Inadequate trash removal;
68 “(E-4) Inoperable heat or air conditioning;
69 “(E-5) Lack of electric, gas, or water service; or”.”
70 (b) Section 504 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3651.04) is amended as follows
71 (1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended to read as follows:“(a)(1) After a petition
72 has been filed under § 42-3651.03, the Court shall expeditiously:
73 “(A) Schedule the case for a hearing on any motion for preliminary
74 injunction filed with the petition; or
75 “(B) Issue an order requiring the owner, agent, lessor, or manager, as
76 respondent, to show cause why a receiver should not be appointed.”.
77 (c) Section 505 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3651.05) is amended as follows:
78 (1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
79 “(a) After a hearing, the Court may appoint a receiver for a rental housing
80 accommodation or continue the appointment of a receiver made ex parte if it finds that the
81 petitioner has proven, by a preponderance of the evidence, the existence of the grounds for
82 receivership as set forth in § 42-3651.02. The failure of the respondent to comply with any
83 preliminary injunction issued by the Court, or to make substantial progress to comply with any

84 future deadlines in any preliminary injunction issued by the Court, shall create a rebuttable
85 presumption in favor of appointment of a receiver for the rental housing accommodation. As part
86 of any order granting a receivership, the Court may also enjoin the respondent from continuing
87 any of the actions, practices, or patterns of neglect at the rental housing accommodation and at
88 any other rental accommodations owned, managed, or controlled by the respondent.
89 (2) Subsection (f) is amended by adding a new paragraph (1A) to read as follows:
90 “(1A) As part of any proceeding commenced for the appointment of a receiver,
91 the Court shall order that the respondent or any owner of the subject rental housing
92 accommodation, or both, respond to financial disclosures requested by the petitioner to identify
93 available funds to pay for the costs of the receivership.
94 (3) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
95 “(g) In a case in which the court has appointed a receiver in response to a petition
96 made pursuant to § 42-3651.03, the Attorney General may file for recordation a notice of the
97 pendency of the action as provided by § 42-1207.”.
98 (d) Section 506 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3651.06) is amended to read as follows:
99 “Sec. 506. Powers and duties of a receiver.
100 “(a) The Court shall issue an order specifying the powers and duties of the receiver,
101 which may include ordering the receiver to:
102 “(1) Take charge of the operation and management of the rental housing
103 accommodation and assume all rights to possess and use the building, fixtures, furnishings,
104 records, and other related property and goods that the owner or property manager would have if
105 the receiver had not been appointed; and

106 “(2) Give notice of the receivership, in accordance with subsection (b) of this
107 section, to the rental housing accommodation’s tenants and employees, all public utility
108 providers whom the owner was responsible for paying before the appointment of the receiver,
109 any mortgage company holding a lien against the property, any federal or local government
110 agency or instrumentality currently paying rents or providing other payments on behalf of any
111 tenant at the rental housing accommodation, and any other person whom the Court orders should
112 receive notice;
113 “(3) Have the power to collect all rents and payments for use and occupancy;
114 “(4)(A) Provide the Court, within 30 days following the issuance of the order of
115 appointment, with a plan for the rehabilitation of the rental housing accommodation, including
116 the projected dates when all causes giving rise to the appointment will be abated and a financial
117 forecast indicating how the rehabilitation will be paid for;
118 “(B) Serve a copy of the plan upon the owner of record, the Attorney
119 General for the District of Columbia, and the tenants of the rental housing accommodation, or
120 their representative;
121 “(5)(A) Report to the Court at least once every 3 months after the filing of the
122 report required under paragraph (4) of this subsection, describing the progress made in abating
123 the conditions giving rise to the appointment, updating the financial forecast for the
124 rehabilitation, and describing any changes in the condition of the rental housing accommodation
125 that may change the proposed completion dates submitted under paragraph (4) of this subsection;
126 “(B) Serve a copy of the report upon the owner of record, the Attorney
127 General for the District of Columbia, and the tenants of the rental housing accommodation, or
128 their representative;

129 “(6) Preserve all property and records with which the receiver has been entrusted;
130 “(7) Assume all rights of the owner to enforce or avoid terms of a lease,
131 mortgage, secured transactions, and other contracts related to the rental housing accommodation
132 and its operation; and
133 “(8) Carry out any other duties established by the Court.
134 “(b) The notice required by subsection (a)(2) of this section shall include, at a minimum,
135 the following information in not less than 12-point type in both English and Spanish:
136 “(1) The reasons for the receivership;
137 “(2) The identity of the receiver, his or her address and telephone number;
138 “(3) The receiver’s responsibilities and duties;
139 “(4) The anticipated duration of the receivership; and
140 “(5) That no tenant is required to move as a result of the receivership.
141 “(c) The receiver shall, under the plan described in subsection (a)(4) of this section, make
142 payments in accordance with the following priorities:
143 “(1) As a first priority, using monthly rental income, to abate housing
144 code violations if abatement is required within 7 days of service of notice, and, after abatement
145 of the conditions, to abate housing code violations if abatement is required within 30 days of
146 service of notice; and
147 “(2) As a second priority, for other purposes reasonably necessary in the
148 ordinary course of business of the property, including maintenance and upkeep of the rental
149 housing accommodation, payment of utility bills, mortgages and other debts, and payment of the
150 receiver’s fee.

151 “(d) The receiver shall not make capital improvements to the property except those
152 necessary to abate housing code violations.
153 “(e) The receiver shall not enter into contracts which affect the ownership of the property,
154 except as otherwise authorized by this section.
155 “(f) The receiver, as well as any property manager or other person or entity hired by the
156 receiver to assist with performing the receiver’s duties, shall be personally liable only for his or
157 her acts of gross negligence or intentional wrongdoing in carrying out the receivership.
158 “(g)(1) A receiver shall be entitled to a reasonable fee established by the Court and
159 payable from the revenues of the rental housing accommodation, including any fees required to
160 retain counsel to represent the receiver in the receivership action.
161 “(2) The receiver shall submit fee petitions to the Court for approval, either
162 through counsel or through the Attorney General.
163 “(3) An owner, as defined in section 105(f)(3), shall be required to pay the
164 receiver for all fees due during the period of the receivership no later than 90 days after the Court
165 approves each fee petition. Any fees unpaid as of that 90-day deadline shall incur interest at the
166 rate of 6% per annum during the first year, and 8% per annum during any subsequent years, until
167 repaid. The receiver may petition the Court to convert the order into a final judgment, and once
168 the order is so converted, the receiver may take actions to collect any unpaid balance, using all
169 available collection methods authorized under District or other applicable law.
170 “(4) An owner's obligation to pay the receiver’s fees pursuant to paragraph (3) of
171 this subsection shall automatically become a lien on the owner's real property as of the 90-day
172 deadline established pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection.

173 “(5) A lien established pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection shall be a prior
174 and preferred lien over all other liens or encumbrances on the real property, provided that any
175 liens recorded by the District pursuant to subsection (j) of this section shall be a prior and
176 preferred lien over any lien recorded by the receiver.
177 “(h) The receiver may apply for grants, subsidies, and loans for the relief of distressed
178 properties to the same extent as the owner of the rental housing accommodation.
179 “(i) The owner, agent, manager, or lessor shall be enjoined, for the duration of the
180 receivership, from:
181 “(1) Collecting rents and payments for use and occupancy and shall immediately
182 turn over any such rents and payments for use and occupancy received by the owner, agent,
183 manager, lessor, or any agent thereof to the receiver; and
184 “(2) Authorizing, implementing, or seeking any increase in rent charged for any
185 unit at the property for the duration of the receivership.
186 “(i-1) Following the termination of the receivership, the owner, agent, manager, or lessor
187 shall not implement or seek any increase in rent charged for any unit at the property based on or
188 to recover for any costs of the receivership, including the costs of any and all repairs and
189 abatements performed by the receiver.
190 “(j)(1) In a case in which the court has appointed a receiver in response to a petition made
191 pursuant tosection 503:
192 “(A) The court may issue an order authorizing the Attorney General to
193 supply funding to the receiver from any funds available in the Tenant Receivership Abatement
194 Fund, established by § 1-301.86e, for any of the following:
195 “(i) Initial or emergency repairs;

196 “(ii) Maintaining utilities, property management, security, or other
197 critical services;
198 “(iii) Relocating and maintaining any tenants displaced for initial
199 or emergency repairs; or
200 “(iv) Providing payment to the receiver for its reasonable fees.
201 “(B) If the court finds, after notice and hearing, that the owner of record of
202 the rental property currently lacks sufficient funds to pay for rehabilitation of the rental housing
203 accommodation and that such funds cannot be feasibly and timely obtained through grants,
204 subsidies, or loans, or that the owner of the rental accommodation is refusing to pay for
205 rehabilitation of the rental housing accommodation or otherwise operating in bad faith, the Court
206 may extend the receivership in place under this chapter based on a showing of demonstrated
207 need and authorize the receiver to do either of the following:
208 “(i) Sell the property for a fair-market price to an owner capable of
209 maintaining and, where necessary, rehabilitating the property; or
210 “(ii) If the owner is a District of Columbia corporation or other
211 entity, file a petition in the appropriate federal bankruptcy court to place the corporate owner into
212 bankruptcy proceedings pursuant to, and in a manner consistent with, the federal Bankruptcy
213 Code.
214 “(C) If the court authorizes the receiver to sell the property, the receiver
215 shall:
216 “(i) Market the property and issue a request for proposals seeking
217 potential purchasers;

218 “(ii) Determine whether each person or entity submitting a
219 proposal to purchase is offering a fair-market price and is capable of maintaining and, where
220 necessary, rehabilitating the property; and
221 “(iii) Provide the Court and the parties with the proposals from all
222 qualifying potential purchasers.
223 “(D) In order to determine whether any potential purchaser is capable of
224 maintaining and, where necessary, rehabilitating the property, the receiver shall require each
225 such individual or entity to submit, and the Court shall evaluate:
226 “(i) Whether the potential purchaser is prepared to furnish the
227 Department of Buildings with a signed and notarized statement acknowledging the receipt of any
228 outstanding notices of violation or orders directing the discontinuance of an unlawful act or
229 condition and/or the abatement or correction of a violation notice, and fully accepting
230 responsibility, without condition, for making the corrections or repairs required by such notices
231 or orders;
232 “(ii) Whether the potential purchaser has submitted a detailed
233 abatement plan to address any and all outstanding notices of violations or orders to abate from
234 the Department of Buildings, to address any and all violations of any equivalent local or federal
235 law or regulation, and, where necessary, to rehabilitate the property as recommended by the
236 receiver;
237 “(iii) Whether the potential purchaser has submitted a detailed
238 funding plan that will provide sufficient funds to complete the abatement plan and any necessary
239 rehabilitation and to maintain the property in compliance with chapters 1 through 16 of Title 14
240 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, Title 12 of the District of Columbia

241 Municipal Regulations, the Air Quality Amendment Act of 2013, effective September 9, 2014
242 (D.C. Law 20-135; D.C. Official Code § 8-241.01 et seq.), and its implementing regulations, and
243 any other applicable laws and regulations; and
244 “(vi) Whether the potential purchaser is otherwise capable of
245 meeting the conditions for termination of the receivership pursuant to § 42–3651.07.
246 “(E) After notice and a hearing, and upon determining that one or more
247 potential purchasers are offering a fair-market price and are capable of maintaining and, where
248 necessary, rehabilitating the property in accordance with applicable laws and regulations, the
249 Court may select a purchaser and authorize the receiver to proceed with sale of the property.
250 “(2)(A) If a court issues an order pursuant to paragraph (1)(A) of this subsection,
251 an owner, shall be required to repay the funding supplied by the Attorney General no later than
252 30 days after the receiver receives those funds. Any funds unpaid as of that 30-day deadline shall
253 incur interest at the rate of 6% per annum during the first year, and 8% per annum during any
254 subsequent years, until repaid. The Attorney General may petition the court to convert the order
255 into a final judgment, and once the order is so converted, the Attorney General may take actions
256 to collect any unpaid balance, using all available collection methods authorized under District or
257 other applicable law.
258 “(B) An owner's obligation to repay funding pursuant to subparagraph (A)
259 of this paragraph shall automatically become a lien on the owner's real property as of the date the
260 Attorney General supplies funds to the receiver pursuant to paragraph (1)(A) of this section.
261 “(C) A lien established pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph
262 shall be a prior and preferred lien over all other liens or encumbrances on the real property
263 (e) Section 507 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3651.07) is amended as follows:

264 (1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
265 “(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a receivership shall terminate
266 when:
267 “(1) The Court determines that the receivership is no longer necessary because the
268 grounds on which the appointment of the receiver was based no longer exist; the receiver has
269 received proper compensation for the services provided; the District of Columbia has been
270 reimbursed for all expenses related to the appointment of the receiver, including any funds
271 provided from the Tenant Receivership Abatement Fund; the District of Columbia has been
272 reimbursed for all expenses related to abatements performed by the District or on its behalf by
273 any third-party; the District has been reimbursed for all expenses related to temporary or
274 emergency relocation of tenants at the property; and all fines, infractions, and penalties arising
275 from code violations at the property to date have been paid in full to the District of Columbia; or
276 “(2) The Court determines on recommendation from the receiver that the
277 violations giving rise to the appointment of the receiver cannot be abated and serves a copy of
278 the order within 10 days on the Director of the Department of Buildings.”.
279 (2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
280 “(a-1) If ownership of the property changes during the pendency of any case
281 maintained under this title, the Court shall, following notice, add the new owner of record as a
282 party to the case. To terminate a receivership as to any former owner of the property, the Court
283 must determine that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are met. To terminate a
284 receivership as to any new owner of the property following a change in ownership, the Court
285 must determine:

286 “(1) That the receivership is no longer necessary because the grounds on which
287 the appointment of the receiver was based no longer exist; and
288 “(2) As to the time period since the change in ownership, the receiver has
289 received proper compensation for the services provided; the District has been reimbursed for all
290 expenses related to the appointment of the receiver; the District has been reimbursed for all
291 expenses related to abatements performed by the District or on its behalf by any third-party; and
292 all fines, infractions, and penalties arising from code violations at the property to date have been
293 paid in full to the District.”.
294 Sec. 3. Section 8 of the Construction Code Approval and Amendments Act of 1986
295 effective March 21, 1987 (D.C. Law 6-216; D.C. Official Code § 6–1407) is amended as
296 follows:
297 (1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “for injunctive relief.
298 Injunctive relief shall be granted on a showing that it will prevent illegal construction activity in
299 the District of Columbia. A plaintiff” and inserting the phrase “for injunctive relief. A plaintiff”
300 in its place.
301 (2) Subsection (b) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3A) to read as
302 follows:
303 “(3A) Ordering any and all repairs or other work needed to comply with any
304 provision of or order issued under the Construction Codes; or
305 (3) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “without bond. The
306 Superior Court of the District of Columbia may also issue a mandatory injunction commanding
307 compliance with any provision or order issued under the Construction Codes.” and inserting the
308 phrase “without bond.” in its place.

309 Sec. 4. Title 29 of the D.C. Official Code is amended as follows:
310 (a) § 29-807.07 is amended by adding a new subsection (a-1) to read as follows:
311 “(a-1)(1) The Superior Court may dissolve a limited liability company in a proceeding by the
312 Attorney General for the District of Columbia if it is established that the company:
313 “(A) Obtained its certificate of organization through fraud; or
314 “(B) Has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by
315 law;
316 “(2)(A) If the Attorney General, in the course of an investigation to determine
317 whether to bring a court action under this section, has reason to believe that a person may have
318 information, or may be in possession, custody, or control of documentary material, relevant to
319 the investigation, the Attorney General may issue in writing, and cause to be served upon the
320 person, a subpoena requiring the person to give oral testimony under oath, or to produce records,
321 books, papers, contracts, electronically-stored data, and other documentary material for
322 inspection and copying.
323 “(B) Information obtained pursuant to this authority to subpoena shall not
324 be admissible in a later criminal proceeding against the person who provided the information.
325 “(C) The Attorney General may petition the Superior Court for an order
326 compelling compliance with a subpoena issued pursuant to this authority to subpoena.
327 “(3) The Superior Court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a company may issue
328 injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court
329 directs, take other action required to preserve the company assets wherever located, and carry on
330 the business of the company until a full hearing can be held.

331 “(4)(A) The Superior Court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a
332 company may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians
333 to manage, the activities and affairs of the company. The court shall hold a hearing, after
334 notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before
335 appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has jurisdiction
336 over the company and all of its property wherever located.
337 “(B) The Superior Court shall describe the powers and duties of the
338 receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended. Among other powers:
339 “(i) The receiver may:
340 “(I) Dispose of all or any part of the assets of the company
341 wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and
342 “(II) Sue and defend in his or her own name as receiver of
343 the company;
344 “(ii) The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the company,
345 through or in place of its members, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the company
346 in the best interests of its members and creditors.
347 “(C) The Superior Court during a receivership may redesignate the
348 receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if
349 doing so is in the best interests of the company, its members, and its creditors.
350 “(D) The Superior Court during the receivership or custodianship may
351 order compensation paid and expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian from the
352 assets of the company or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

353 “(5) If, after a hearing, the Superior Court determines that one or more grounds
354 for judicial dissolution described in § 29-807.07 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the
355 company and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall
356 deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Mayor, who shall file it.
357 “(6) After entering the decree of dissolution, the Superior Court shall direct the
358 notification of claimants and the winding-up and liquidation of the company’s activities and
359 affairs in accordance with § 29-804.03 - § 29-804.07.
360 (b) Section 29–708.11 is amended by adding a new subsection (a-1) to read as follows:
361 “(a-1)(1) The Superior Court may dissolve a limited partnership:
362 “(1) In a proceeding by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia if it is
363 established that the company:
364 “(A) Obtained its certificate of limited partnership through fraud; or
365 “(B) Has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by
366 law.
367 “(2)(A) If the Attorney General, in the course of an investigation to determine
368 whether to bring a court action under this section, has reason to believe that a person may have
369 information, or may be in possession, custody, or control of documentary material, relevant to
370 the investigation, the Attorney General may issue in writing, and cause to be served upon the
371 person, a subpoena requiring the person to give oral testimony under oath, or to produce records,
372 books, papers, contracts, electronically-stored data, and other documentary material for
373 inspection and copying.
374 “(B) Information obtained pursuant to this authority to subpoena shall not
375 be admissible in a later criminal proceeding against the person who provided the information.

376 “(C) The Attorney General may petition the Superior Court for an order
377 compelling compliance with a subpoena issued pursuant to this authority to subpoena.
378 “(3) The Superior Court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a partnership may
379 issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the
380 court directs, take other action required to preserve the partnership assets wherever located, and
381 carry on the business of the partnership until a full hearing can be held.
382 “(4)(A) The Superior Court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a
383 partnership may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more
384 custodians to manage, the activities and affairs of the partnership. The court shall hold a hearing,
385 after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court,
386 before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has
387 jurisdiction over the partnership and all of its property wherever located.
388 “(B) The Superior Court shall describe the powers and duties of the
389 receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended. Among other powers:
390 “(i) The receiver may:
391 “(I) Dispose of all or any part of the assets of the
392 partnership wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and
393 “(II) Sue and defend in his or her own name as receiver of
394 the partnership;
395 “(ii) The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the
396 partnership, through or in place of its partners, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of
397 the partnership in the best interests of its partners and creditors.

398 “(C) The Superior Court during a receivership may redesignate the
399 receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if
400 doing so is in the best interests of the partnership, its partners, and its creditors.
401 “(D) The Superior Court during the receivership or custodianship may
402 order compensation paid and expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian from the
403 assets of the partnership or proceeds from the sale of the assets.
404 “(5) If, after a hearing, the Superior Court determines that one or more grounds
405 for judicial dissolution described in § 29-708.11 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the
406 partnership and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall
407 deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Mayor, who shall file it.
408 “(6) After entering the decree of dissolution, the Superior Court shall direct the
409 notification of claimants and the winding-up and liquidation of the partnership’s activities and
410 affairs in accordance with § 29-708.03, § 29-708.06, and § 29-708.07.
411 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
412 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
413 statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October
414 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
415 Sec. 6. Effective date.
416 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
417 action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of Congressional review as
418 provided in sections 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
419 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).